Utah statutes.
4-30-9.   Suspension or revocation of license -- Grounds.

The department is authorized to suspend or revoke the license of any livestock market or livestock market weighman who:

(1)  violates any provision of this chapter or any rule promulgated under this chapter; or

(2)  engages in any fraudulent or deceitful activity.

